dictsource/as_rules
// Pronounciation rule for Assamese.
// This file is UTF8 encoded 

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs

.replace
 ০	0
 ১	1
 ২	2
 ৩	3
 ৪	4
 ৫	5
 ৬	6
 ৭	7
 ৮	8
 ৯	9

// Vowels

.group অ
       অ		V
       অঁ		O~
       অ্যা		&          // V,ja in [æmiba]
      

.group আ
       আ		a
       আঁ		a~

.group ই
        ই		i
        ইঁ		i~


.group ঈ
        ঈ		i
        ঈঁ		i~


.group উ
        উ		u
        উঁ		u~
        
.group ঊ
        ঊ		u
        ঊঁ		u~
.group ঋ
        ঋ		ri
       
.group এ
        এ		&
        এঁ		&~
        
.group ঐ
        ঐ		oj
        ঐঁ		o~j
        
.group এ
        এ		e
        এঁ		e~
        
        এ্যা		&    // e,ja  [ækademi]

.group ও
        ও		U        // Assamese ও/ো spell [ʊ], not [o] (WikiPron: 217/240)
        ওঁ		U~
        
.group ঔ
        ঔ		ow
        ঔঁ		o~w

// Vowel Signs

.group া
     C) া	a
     C) াঁ	a~

.group ি
     C) ি	i
     C) িঁ	i~

.group ী
     C) ী	i
     C) ীঁ	i~

.group ূ
     C) ূ	u
     C) ূঁ	u~

.group ু
     C) ু	u
     C) ুঁ	u~

.group ৃ
     C) ৃ	r'i

.group ে
     C) ে	e
     C) েঁ	e~
     C) েউ	ew

.group ৈ
     C) ৈ	oj
     C) ৈঁ	o~j

.group ো
     C) ো	U
     C) োঁ	U~

.group ৌ
     C) ৌ	ow
     C) ৌঁ	o~w

       
// Consonants

.group ক
        ক		kV
        ক (B	k
     _) ক্ষ		k#V      // WikiPron: initial [kʰ], medial [kkʰ]
     _) ক্ষ (B	k#
        ক্ষ		kk#V
        ক্ষ (B	kk#
.group খ
        খ		k#V
        খ (B	k#
        
        
.group গ
        গ		gV
        গ (B	g


.group ঘ
        ঘ		g#V
        ঘ (B	g#

        
.group ঙ
        ঙ		NV
        ঙ (B	N


.group চ
        চ		sV
        চ (B	s


.group ছ
        ছ		sV
        ছ (B	s


.group জ
        জ		zV
        জ (B	z

        জ্ব		zV
        জ্ব (B	z
        জ্ঞ		ggo~
        জ্ঞ (B	gg


.group ঝ
        ঝ		zV
        ঝ (B	z


.group ঞ
        ঞ		nV
        ঞ (B	n
 

.group ট
        ট		tV
        ট (B	t


.group ঠ
        ঠ		t#V
        ঠ (B	t#

.group ড
        ড		dV
        ড (B	d
        ড়		rV
        ড় (B	r

.group ঢ
        ঢ		d#V
        ঢ (B	d#
        ঢ়		rV
        ঢ় (B	r


.group ণ
        ণ		nV   // should be [n.] if adjacent to t. or d. ?
        ণ (B	n


.group ত
        ত		tV
        ত (B	t
.group থ
        থ		t#V
        থ (B	t#


.group দ
        দ		dV
        দ (B	d


.group ধ
        ধ		d#V
        ধ (B	d#


.group ন
        ন		nV
        ন (B	n

        
.group প
        প		pV
        প (B	p

  
.group ফ
        ফ		p#V
        ফ (B	p#


.group ব
        ব		bV
        ব (B	b

        
.group ভ
        ভ		b#V
        ভ (B	b#

        
.group ম
        ম		mV
        ম (B	m

        
.group য
        য		zV       // Assamese has no [dʒ]: WikiPron 33/37 initial য = z
        য (B	z
        // য় = য + nukta once Unicode-normalized, so it has to live here
        য়		jV
    _) য় (B	j
        য় (B        // used to separate 2 vowels
     ্) য (_	:O   // double the previous consonant
     ্) য (B_	:        
     ্) য (C	&   //  ব্যস্ত  [bæsto]
     ্) যা	&    // ব্যাকরণ [bækɔron] 


.group ৰ
        ৰ		rV
        ৰ	(B	r

    
.group ল
        ল		lV
        ল  (B	l

.group ৱ
        ৱ		wV
        ৱ (B	w
     // After o/u vowels ৱ is not heard: কোৱা [kʊa], উঠোৱা [utʰʊa] (WikiPron).
     // After a/e it is: সেৱা [xɛwa], so those keep [w].
     ো) ৱ		V
     ো) ৱ (B	
     ু) ৱ		V
     ু) ৱ (B	
     ূ) ৱ		V
     ূ) ৱ (B	
     ও) ৱ		V
     ও) ৱ (B	
     উ) ৱ		V
     উ) ৱ (B	
     ঊ) ৱ		V
     ঊ) ৱ (B	
     ৌ) ৱ		V
     ৌ) ৱ (B	


.group শ
        শ		XV
        শ (B	X
        শ (্ল	s
     _) শ্ব		sV       // WikiPron: শ্ব/স্ব are [s] initially, [ss] medially
     _) শ্ব (B	s
        শ্ব		ssV
        শ্ব (B	ss
.group ষ
        ষ		XV
        ষ (B	X


.group স
        স		XV
        স (B	X        
        স (্থ	s
        স (্ত	s        
        স (্য	s  // সমস্যা        
     _) স্ব		sV
     _) স্ব (B	s
        স্ব		ssV
        স্ব (B	ss
     ্) স		sV       // second member of a conjunct (নক্সা) is [s]
     ্) স (B	s
.group হ
        হ		hV  
        হ (B	h
.group হ্ব
        হ্ব		vV
        হ্ব (B	v

        
.group ৎ
        ৎ		t

.group ঁ
    C) ঁ	 O~     // candrabindu, nasalize the previous vowel/Consonants

.group ং
    A) ং	N     //  anusvara/onushshor
    C) ং	N    
   
.group ঃ              // visarga/bishorgo
        ঃ             // doubles the following consonant
      ঃ (_	H

.group ্		// virama/hoshonto
	্



//    D_) - (_D    bij'og
